North Carolina, session 2025, HB870.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENTS BETWEEN DEQ AND USEPA TO REQUIRE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY APPROVAL
SECTION 1.(a) Article 7 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-279.4B. Requirements for Department administration of federally delegated
environmental programs.
All memorandums of agreement between the United States Environmental Protection
Agency and the Department of Environmental Quality, the Environmental Management
Commission, the Coastal Resources Commission, the Sedimentation Control Commission, and
any other board or commission charged under the State's statutes with implementation of State
or federal environmental law shall, prior to execution, require approval of the General Assembly
by majority vote of the Senate and the House of Representatives. The Governor shall transmit
any proposed memorandums of agreements of this nature, or modifications to such agreements,
to the presiding officers of the Senate and the House of Representatives for confirmation by joint
resolution. Implementation of the terms of such agreements shall be prohibited absent
confirmation by the General Assembly."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 143B-279.4B, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall
apply to memorandums of agreement, or modifications to such agreements, proposed for
execution on or after the effective date of this act.

DEQ TO INITIATE DISCUSSIONS WITH USEPA TO REVISE MEMORANDUM OF
AGREEMENT(S) GOVERNING IMPLEMENTATION OF SEDIMENTATION
REQUIREMENTS IN THE STATE
SECTION 2. No later than October 1, 2025, the Department of Environmental
Quality shall notify the United States Environmental Protection Agency (USEPA) of its intent to
*H870-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
initiate discussions to revise the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Memorandum
of Agreement between the State of North Carolina and USEPA Region 4, and any other
agreement with USEPA, that governs the State's Sedimentation Pollution Control Act of 1973
(Act), and its implementation of NPDES General Permit NCG010000 (NCG01) to streamline the
regulatory requirements of the Act and NCG01 for the purpose of eliminating program
redundancies to minimize (i) unnecessary costs to, and duplication of efforts by, persons
initiating land-disturbing activities, (ii) unnecessary delays in project development, and (iii)
inefficient use of Department personnel and staff of local governments that administer delegated
erosion and sedimentation control programs. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate may each appoint a person to participate in the
discussions, and the Department shall provide notice of and access to all discussions and
materials related to the negotiations. The appointees shall report to the Speaker of the House of
Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate on the progress and results of the
discussions. The Department shall report to the Environmental Policy Council on the status of
their activities pursuant to this section quarterly, beginning January 1, 2026, until such time as
the General Assembly repeals this reporting requirement.

DEQ TO REQUEST THAT USEPA CONSULT DEQ ON PROPOSED CHANGES TO
ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL REGULATIONS PRIOR TO NOTICE OF SAME IN
THE FEDERAL REGISTER
SECTION 3. No later than October 1, 2025, the Department of Environmental
Quality shall request that the United States Environmental Protection Agency (USEPA) consult
with the Department on any proposed changes to federal regulations that would impact the State's
administration of federal environmental programs in North Carolina, prior to the USEPA's notice
of such proposed changes in the Federal Register, so that the State may have opportunity for
meaningful collaborative input on development of regulations that it may be charged with
administering. The Department shall report to the Environmental Policy Council on the status of
their activities pursuant to this section quarterly, beginning January 1, 2026, until such time as
the General Assembly repeals this reporting requirement.

DEQ TO PROVIDE COPIES OF AGREEMENTS WITH USEPA AND ASSOCIATED
FUNDING INFORMATION
SECTION 4. No later than October 1, 2025, the Department of Environmental
Quality shall submit copies of any agreements executed between the Department and the United
States Environmental Protection Agency that govern the State's administration of programs under
the Clean Water Act to the House Local Government – Land Use, Planning and Development
Committee. In addition, the Department shall provide information to the Committee on:
(1) Any federal funds received by the State in connection with the State's
administration of such programs, and all federal requirements for receipt of
such funds; and
(2) The adequacy of funding from all sources to fully implement the requirements
of such agreements.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 5. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 870-First Edition